District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

10-1271

Established.

Repealed.

History

Nov. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 3-36, § 3, 26 DCR 1439
Dec. 21, 1985, D.C. Law 6-74, § 3(a), 32 DCR 6475
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 23, 36 DCR 492
Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-199, § 2, 37 DCR 7332
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2082(l), 57 DCR 181

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 10-1211.
1981 Ed., § 9-602.
1973 Ed., § 9-602.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2082(l) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2082(l) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).